Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-259
Deeds and other instruments; formal defects; what constitutes.

The defects, irregularities and omissions mentioned in section 76-258 shall include all defects and irregularities in respect to formalities of execution and recording, and all defects and irregularities in, as well as the entire lack or omission of attestation, acknowledgment, certificate of acknowledgment, or certificate of recording, and shall apply with like force to instruments whether or not the real estate involved is homestead.

Laws 1941, c. 152, § 2, p. 593;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-277;

R.S.1943, § 76-259.